tests/infixes04-bug.aff
# infixes (see manual)
#remark:
# if we have the same suffixes with differents strips we will get only one suffix rule in the output
#if we comment one rule the other works.
#drink drunk
SFX K Y 1
SFX K i.. u.. .

#hang hung
SFX B Y 1
SFX B a.. u.. .
